Massachusetts, session 194th, H4524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the executive
body of the town of Williamsburg, previously known as the board of selectmen, shall be known
as the select board and shall have the powers and authority of a board of selectmen under any
general or special law and the members of the select board, previously known as selectmen, shall
be known as select board members.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding sections 21 and 32 of chapter 40 of the General Laws,
section 5 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, or any other general or special law to the contrary,
the select board of the town of Williamsburg may amend the general by-laws and zoning by-laws
of the town by majority vote to revise all references to the board of selectmen and selectmen to
the select board and select board members, respectively, in accordance with section 1.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1